New York, session 2025-2026, A9280.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs (iv) and (v) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 5 of section 422 of the social services law, subparagraph (iv) as 3 amended by chapter 555 of the laws of 2000, and subparagraph (v) as 4 amended by chapter 256 of the laws of 2014, are amended and a new 5 subparagraph (vi) is added to read as follows: 6 (iv) to the subject of the report; [and] 7 (v) to a district attorney, an assistant district attorney, an inves- 8 tigator employed in the office of a district attorney, or to a sworn 9 officer of the division of state police, of a city, county, town or 10 village police department or of a county sheriff's office when such 11 official verifies that the report is necessary to conduct an active 12 investigation or prosecution of a violation of subdivision four of 13 section 240.50 of the penal law[.]; and 14 (vi) to any person engaged in a bona fide research purpose, provided, 15 however, that no information identifying the subjects of the report and 16 other persons named in the report shall be made available to the 17 researcher unless it is absolutely essential to the research purpose and 18 the department gives prior approval. 19 § 2. Subparagraph (vii) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 5 of section 20 427-a of the social services law, as amended by chapter 377 of the laws 21 of 2011, is amended and a new subparagraph (viii) is added to read as 22 follows: 23 (vii) the subject of the report included in the records of the family 24 assessment and services track[.]; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14039-02-5 A. 9280 2 1 (viii) any person engaged in a bona fide research purpose, provided, 2 however, that no information identifying the subjects of the report and 3 other persons named in the report and records created shall be made 4 available to the researcher unless it is absolutely essential to the 5 research purpose and the department gives prior approval. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.